District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.16

Vacancies resulting from abolishment of offices of Commissioner and Assistant to the Commissioner.

Until the 1st day of July next after the first Mayor takes office under this chapter no vacancy occurring in any District agency by reason of § 1-207.11, abolishing the offices of Commissioner of the District of Columbia and Assistant to the Commissioner, shall affect the power of the remaining members of such agency to exercise its functions; but such agency may take action only if a majority of the members holding office vote in favor of it.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 716
This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.